California, session 20252026, SB228.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation implementing several recommendations made in California State Auditor Report 2023-103: The Comprehensive Perinatal Services Program to enhance monitoring and oversight of the program:(a) Clarify that the State Department of Health Care Services is primarily responsible for the delivery of the Comprehensive Perinatal Services Program benefits benefit as the single state agency pursuant to Section 10740 of the Welfare and Institutions Code that oversees the Medi-Cal program. It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Health Care Services collaborate with the State Department of Public Health when appropriate.(b) Require the State Department of Health Care Services to collaborate with the State Department of Public Health on updated regulations related to the Comprehensive Perinatal Services Program.(c) Require the State Department of Health Care Services to develop a system of oversight to ensure that managed care plans and providers and fee-for-service providers are aware of and offer Comprehensive Perinatal Services Program services to all pregnant and postpartum Medi-Cal members. beneficiaries.(d) Require the State Department of Health Care Services to create and use a perinatal services data form to engage in additional data collection duties. duties as part of monitoring and overseeing Medi-Cal’s Comprehensive Perinatal Services Program benefit in both the managed care and fee-for-service delivery systems.SEC. 2. Section 123486 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:123486. Notwithstanding Section 131051, the duties and responsibilities outlined in this article do not supersede the State Department of Health Care Services’ authority as the designated single state agency for the administration of the federal Medicaid program pursuant to Section 10740 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and as designated in California’s Medicaid state plan. As such, in addition to the duties required by the department, the State Department of Health Care Services is ultimately responsible for the implementation of this benefit for the purposes of the Medi-Cal program.SEC. 3. Section 123487 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:123487. (a) The department shall, in collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services, update the regulations related to the statewide comprehensive community-based perinatal services program to clarify the roles and responsibilities from each department and make adjustments to the current monitoring and oversights systems, including the monitoring of managed care plans and fee-for-service providers, by July 1, 2027.(b) The department shall, in collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services, develop a training on administering the perinatal program and require that all perinatal providers in the program attend the training. training, including managed care plan and fee-for-service providers.(c) The department shall, in collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services, develop a form for managed care plan and fee-for-service providers to collect information information, starting no later than January 31, 2026, on the offer and use of perinatal services, and shall share the information collected with the State Department of Health Care Services for inclusion in all perinatal quality assurance efforts, including the triennial report required pursuant to Section 123521.(d)The department shall develop and implement a system to verify the information provided pursuant to subdivision (c).SEC. 4. Section 123501 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:123501. (a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall require all Medi-Cal managed care plans to include information on the enhanced perinatal program benefits in the plan member handbooks.(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall require all Medi-Cal managed care plans to ensure that providers have received the training described in Section 123487.(c) The No later than January 31, 2026, the State Department of Health Care Services shall implement a system to ensure that Medi-Cal managed care plans and fee-for-service providers offer and provide Comprehensive Perinatal Services Program services to eligible enrollees. beneficiaries.(d) The State Department of Health Care Services shall require Medi-Cal managed care plans, as defined in Section 14184.101 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to conduct quality assurance reviews on perinatal providers at least once every three years, starting in January 2026, to ensure that Medi-Cal managed care plan enrollees are being offered and receive Comprehensive Perinatal Services Program services.(e) The department shall develop and implement a system to verify compliance with subdivision (c).SEC. 5. Section 123521 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:123521. (a) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services shall, no later than July 15, 2026, submit to the Assembly Health Committee and the Senate Health Committee, and post on its internet website, a report that identifies the number of pregnant and postpartum individuals that received Comprehensive Perinatal Services Program services from January 1, 2022, to January 1, 2025, inclusive.(2) The State Department of Health Care Services shall, no later than July 15, 2026, submit to the Assembly Health Committee and the Senate Health Committee, and post on its internet website, a report that identifies the number of pregnant and postpartum individuals that were offered Comprehensive Perinatal Services Program services from January 1, 2022, to January 1, 2025, inclusive.(2)(3) Commencing January 1, 2028, and every three years thereafter, the State Department of Health Care Services shall submit to the Assembly Health Committee and the Senate Health Committee, and post on its internet website, a report that identifies the number of pregnant and postpartum individuals that received Comprehensive Perinatal Services Program services during the previous three years.(4) Commencing January 1, 2028, and every three years thereafter, the State Department of Health Care Services shall submit to the Assembly Health Committee and the Senate Health Committee, and post on its internet website, a report that identifies the number of pregnant and postpartum individuals that were offered Comprehensive Perinatal Services Program services during the previous three years.(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.